Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB608.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 41ASSOCIATION HEALTH PLANSSec.4101. Definitions.4102. H ealth insurance policy requirements. 4103. Applicability.§ 4101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Association." As follows:123456789101112131415161718 (1) A member-based organization of employer members.(2) The term shall include all of the following:(i) Employers that are in the same industry, trade or profession.(ii) Employers that are domiciled or residing in this Commonwealth that do not share the same industry, trade or profession to the extent permitted under the regulations of the United States Department of Labor in relation to ERISA."Employee." An individual employed by an employer. The term shall include a sole proprietor to the extent permitted under the regulations of the United States Department of Labor in relation to ERISA."Employee welfare benefit plan." As the term is defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(1) (relating to definitions)."Employer." As follows:(1) As the term is defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(5).(2) The term shall include an association. For purposes of determining employer size of an association, all of the employees of employer members of the association shall be aggregated and treated as employed by a single employer."ERISA." The Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.)."Group health plan." An employee welfare benefit plan, to the extent that the plan provides health care service and includes items and services paid for as health care service to employees of an employer, employees of employer members of an association, small employers or any combination of these persons, directly or through insurance, reimbursement or otherwise.20250SB0608PN0625 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Health care service." A covered treatment, admission, procedure, medical supply or equipment or other service, including behavioral health, prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a health care provider to an insured under a health insurance policy."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) An insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A dental only policy.(ix) A vision only policy.(x) A workers' compensation policy.(xi) An automobile medical payment policy.(xii) A homeowners insurance policy.(xiii) Another similar policy providing for limited benefits."Insured." As follows:(1) A person on whose behalf an insurer is obligated to pay covered health care expense benefits or provide health care services under a health insurance policy.20250SB0608PN0625 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term includes a policyholder, certificate holder, subscriber, member, dependent or other individual who is eligible to receive health care services under a health insurance policy."Insurer." An entity licensed by the department with accident and health authority to issue a health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Large employer." As follows:(1) In connection with a group health plan or health insurance coverage with respect to a calendar year and a plan year, an employer that:(i) employed an average of at least 51 employees on business days during the preceding calendar year; and(ii) employs at least one employee on the first day of the plan year.(2) The term shall include an association that includes at least 51 employees of employer members of the association on the first day of the plan year."Large group market." The health insurance market under which individuals obtain health insurance coverage, directly or through any arrangement, on behalf of themselves and their dependents through a group health plan maintained by a large 20250SB0608PN0625 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employer."Small employer." As follows:(1) In connection with a group health plan or health insurance coverage with respect to a calendar year and a plan year, an employer that:(i) employed an average of at least one but not more than 50 employees on business days during the preceding calendar year; and(ii) employs at least two employees on the first day of the plan year.(2) The term shall include:(i) An association that includes 50 or fewer employees of employer members of the association on the first day of the plan year.(ii) A sole proprietor to the extent recognized by regulations of the United States Department of Labor in relation to ERISA."Sole proprietor." An individual who meets all of the following criteria:(1) The individual has an ownership right in a trade or business, regardless of whether the trade or business is incorporated or unincorporated.(2) The individual earns wages or self-employment income from the trade or business.(3) The individual works at least 20 hours a week or 80 hours per month providing personal services for the trade or business or earns income from the trade or business that at least equals the cost of the health insurance policy issued to an association.§ 4102. H ealth insurance policy requirements. 20250SB0608PN0625 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Association policies.--A health insurance policy may be issued to an association, in which the association shall be deemed the policyholder, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:(1) The health insurance policy is issued by an insurer or a foreign health insurance issuer that is duly licensed in the state in which the foreign health insurance issuer is domiciled as permitted under the laws of this Commonwealth.(2) The association:(i) Has been actively in existence for at least two years.(ii) Has been formed and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining a health insurance policy.(iii) Has a constitution and bylaws that provide the following:(A) The association shall hold regular meetings not less than annually to further purposes of the members of the association.(B) The association shall collect dues or solicit contributions from members of the association.(C) The members of the association have voting privileges and representation on the board governing the association.(iv) Does not condition membership in the association on any health-status-related factor relating to an individual or a dependent of the individual.(v) Makes health insurance coverage offered through the association available to all members of the 20250SB0608PN0625 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 association regardless of any health-status-related factor relating to the members or their dependents.(vi) Does not make health insurance coverage offered through the association available other than in connection with a member of the association.(b) Large group market plans.--If the association described in subsection (a) includes 51 or more employees, the policy issued to the association shall:(1) Be treated as a large group market plan subject to the large group market insurance regulations under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 6A (relating to public health service). The policy shall be guaranteed issue and guaranteed renewable.(2) Be subject to the group health plan coverage requirements under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. § 18001 et seq.), including, but not limited to, the prohibition against denying coverage based on a preexisting condition.(3) Comply with all coverage mandates applicable to a large group market plan offered in this Commonwealth.(4) Provide a level of coverage that equals the actuarial value for a platinum, gold, silver or bronze plan as specified under 42 U.S.C. § 18022(d) (relating to essential health benefits requirements). The level of coverage under this paragraph shall not have an actuarial value below 60%.(c) Issuer requirements.-- (1) If the association specified under subsection (a)(2) is composed of employer members that are sole proprietors or do not share the same industry, trade or profession to the extent permitted under regulations of the United States 20250SB0608PN0625 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Labor in relation to ERISA, a health insurance issuer under subsection (a)(1) shall:(i) Treat all of the employees who are enrolled in coverage under the policy as a single risk pool.(ii) Set premiums based on the collective group experience of the employees who are enrolled in coverage under the policy.(iii) Set premiums based on the average age of the employees who are enrolled in coverage under the policy.(iv) Be prohibited from varying premiums based on gender.(v) Be prohibited from establishing discriminatory rules based on the health status of an employer member or an individual employee of an employer member for eligibility or contribution requirements.(2) In the case of an association specified under subsection (a)(2) that does not include sole proprietors, a health insurance issuer under subsection (a)(1) may vary premiums for each employer member by the average age of the employees of the employer member. Premiums under this paragraph may not vary among each employer member by more than five to one.(d) Compliance and administration.--(1) The association shall comply with the requirements applicable to a plan sponsor, as that term is defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(16)(B) (relating to definitions).(2) The health plan providing coverage under the policy to employees shall be administered in accordance with the requirements applicable to an employee welfare benefit plan.(e) Governing board.--The association shall establish a 20250SB0608PN0625 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governing board to manage and operate the health plan. The following shall apply:(1) At least 75% of the governing board shall be comprised of employees of employer members of the association participating in the health plan, with the remaining percentage being comprised of representatives designated by the association.(2) The employees of employer members of the association participating in the health plan shall nominate and, through an election where each employee is given a vote, elect members to serve on the governing board.(3) The governing board shall be treated as a fiduciary, as that term is described in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(21)(A), and shall manage and operate the health plan:(i) For the exclusive purpose of all of the following:(A) Providing health benefits to employees enrolled in coverage under the health plan.(B) Defraying expenses relating to administration of the health plan.(ii) With the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person in a similar capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a similar character and with similar aims.(f) Coverage.--If an employee of an employer member of the association terminates employment with the employer member and is subsequently reemployed by another employer member of the association, the employee shall remain covered under the policy issued to the association.20250SB0608PN0625 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4103. Applicability.This chapter shall not apply to an association that offers or provides health care services through a health insurance policy that is not fully insured. An association offering or providing health care services through a health insurance policy that is not fully insured shall be subject to the requirements of section 208 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.789, No.285), known as The Insurance Department Act of 1921.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0608PN0625 - 10 - 123456789